Illinois, session 104th, HB3313.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5changing Section 2-1003 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 5/2-1003)  (from Ch. 110, par. 2-1003)7    Sec. 2-1003. Discovery and depositions. 8    (a) Discovery, such as admissions of fact and of 9genuineness of documents, physical and mental examinations of 10parties and other persons, the taking of any depositions, and 11interrogatories, shall be in accordance with rules.12    (b) (Blank).13    (c) (Blank).14    (d) Whenever the defendant in any litigation in this State 15has the right to demand a physical or mental examination of the 16plaintiff pursuant to statute or Supreme Court Rule, relative 17to the occurrence and extent of injuries or damages for which 18claim is made, or in connection with the plaintiff's capacity 19to exercise any right plaintiff has, or would have but for a 20finding based upon such examination, the plaintiff has the 21right to have his or her attorney, or such other person as the 22plaintiff may wish, present at such physical or mental 23examination. The plaintiff also has the right to designate an   HB3313- 2 -LRB104 08899 JRC 18954 b1additional person to be present and video record the 2examination. The changes to this Section by this amendatory 3Act of the 103rd General Assembly apply to actions commenced 4or pending on or after the effective date of this amendatory 5Act of the 103rd General Assembly. 6    (e) No person or organization shall be required to furnish 7claims, loss or risk management information held or provided 8by an insurer, which information is described in Section 9143.10a of the "Illinois Insurance Code".10    (f) In any action seeking damages for personal injury 11alleging negligence against an operator of a motor vehicle, no 12discovery may be taken by the plaintiff if the total damages 13sought is equal to or less than the amount of minimum liability 14insurance required by Section 7-203 of the Illinois Vehicle 15Code. In such cases, each party must disclose to all other 16parties all documents a party intends to introduce into 17evidence at trial. The changes to this Section by this 18amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly apply to actions 19commenced or pending on or after the effective date of this 20amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 21(Source: P.A. 103-388, eff. 7-28-23.)